pl: Typ mocowania hamulca: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Piwoty V-Brake/Cantilever; Inne
lt-LT: Stabdžių montavimo tipas: „Centerlock“; Tiesioginis tvirtinimas; Plokščias tvirtinimas; IS (tarptautinis standartas); „Post Mount 160“; „Post Mount 180“; „Post Mount 200/203“; V formos stabdžių / gembiniai išsikišimai; Kitas
es: Tipo de montaje de freno: Centerlock; Montaje directo; Flat Mount; IS (estándar internacional); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Frenos V-brake/soportes cantilever; Otro
el: Τύπος βάσης στήριξης φρένου: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Υποδοχές V-brake/Cantilever; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de suporte do travão: Centerlock; Montagem direta; Montagem plana; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Ressaltos V-brake/Cantilever; Outro
hu: Fékrögzítés típusa: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-fék/Cantilever fékcsap; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на спирачката: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (международен стандарт); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Основи за V-образни/кантилевър спирачки; Други
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งเบรก: เซ็นเตอร์ล็อก; ไดเร็กต์เมาท์; แฟลตเมาท์; IS (มาตรฐานสากล); โพสต์เมาท์ 160; โพสต์เมาท์ 180; โพสต์เมาท์ 200/203; วีเบรก/แคนทิลิเวอร์; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta nosača za bicikl: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-brake / nosači cantilever; Ostalo
nb: Monteringstype for brems: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-brems/Cantilever-fester; Annet
fr: Type de fixation du frein: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (Standard International); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Tasseaux V-Brake/Cantilever; Autre
de: Befestigungstyp der Bremse: Center Lock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (Internationaler Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-Brake/Cantilever-Sockel; Sonstige
ja: ブレーキマウントタイプ: センターロック; ダイレクトマウント; フラットマウント; IS (インターナショナルスタンダード); ポストマウント160; ポストマウント180; ポストマウント200/203; Vブレーキ/カンチ台座; その他
ko: 브레이크 장착 유형: 센터락; 다이렉트 마운트; 플랫 마운트; IS(국제 표준); 포스트 마운트 160; 포스트 마운트 180; 포스트 마운트 200/203; V-브레이크/캔틸레버 보스; 기타
ro-RO: Tipul de montare al frânei: Centerlock; Montare directă; Flat Mount; IS (Standard Internațional); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Pivoți V-brake/Cantilever; Altele
da: Bremsebeslagstype: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-bremse/cantilever-bosser; Andet
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia brzdy: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Čapy na V-brzdy/Cantilever; Iné
nl: Type remmontage: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-brake/cantilever-nokken; Overig
zh-TW: 煞車安裝類型: 中心鎖入; 直鎖式; 平鎖式; IS (國際標準); 柱式安裝 160; 柱式安裝 180; 柱式安裝 200/203; V 夾/懸臂煞車座; 其他
fi: Jarrun kiinnitystyyppi: Centerlock; Direct mount; Flat mount; IS (International Standard); Post mount 160; Post mount 180; Post mount 200/203; V-jarru/Cantilever-tappi; Muu
vi: Kiểu ngàm gắn phanh: Khóa trung tâm; Ngàm gắn trực tiếp; Ngàm gắn phẳng; IS (Tiêu chuẩn quốc tế); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Chốt V-brake/Cantilever; Khác
it: Tipo di montaggio del freno: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Perni V-brake/cantilever; Altro
sv: Typ av bromsfäste: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Fästen för V-broms/Cantilever; Övrigt
en: Brake mount type: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-brake/Cantilever Bosses; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta nosilca zavore: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-brake/nastavki Cantilever; Drugo
ru: Тип крепления тормоза: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Бобышки для V-brake/кантилеверных тормозов; Другое
zh-CN: 刹车安装类型: Centerlock; 直装式; 平装式; IS（国际标准）; 柱装式 160; 柱装式 180; 柱装式 200/203; V 刹/悬臂刹安装座; 其他
cs: Typ uchycení brzdy: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Čepy V-brake / Cantilever; Jiné
tr: Fren montaj tipi: Merkez kilit; Doğrudan montaj; Düz montaj; IS (Uluslararası Standart); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; V-fren/Cantilever (kumpas) pimleri; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do freio: Centerlock; Direct Mount; Flat Mount; IS (International Standard); Post Mount 160; Post Mount 180; Post Mount 200/203; Pinos V-brake/Cantilever; Outro